District of Columbia statutes.
45-403

Acts relating to governing bodies of religious denominations.

All acts and parts of acts relating to the organization and powers of vestries, trustees, or other governing bodies of any religious denomination shall remain in force except insofar as the same are inconsistent with or are replaced by the provisions of this Code.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854, § 1636
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 546, ch. 1329
Nonprofit corporations, formation under other acts, see § 29-301.03.
1981 Ed., § 49-303.
1973 Ed., § 49-303.